Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 1

General Provisions

45-3-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Savings and Loan Act.”

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.01; T.C.A., § 45-1301.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 14; 1919, ch. 136, §§ 2, 3, 8, 9, 11; 1929, ch. 117, §§ 3, 5-8; Shan. Supp., §§ 2135, 2179a2, 2179a3, 2179a8, 2179a9, 2179a11; Code 1932, §§ 3899, 3902, 3903, 3907, 3909, 3910-3911, 3914, 3915, 3917; Acts 1933, ch. 19, §§ 1-4, 6, 7, 9-11, 15, 16; 1935 (E.S.), ch. 27, §§ 1-3, 5; 1935 (E.S.), ch. 28, § 4; 1935 (E.S.), ch. 34, § 1; Code Supp. 1950, §§ 3898.1-3898.11, 3898.23-3898.29, 3898.31-3898.33, 3898.46-3898.50, 3898.57; (Williams, §§ 3898.1-3898.4, 3898.6, 3898.7, 3898.9-3898.11, 3898.15, 3898.16, 3902, 3903, 3904.1-3904.5, 3914, 3918.8); Acts 1957, ch. 281, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 282, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 501, § 1; 1969, ch. 124, § 1; 1973, ch. 274, § 1; 1973, ch. 360, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 361, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 698, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1976, ch. 582, §§ 1, 2, 3(a), (b), (f)-(i), 4), concerning operation and management of building and loan associations was repealed by Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 6.01 and the present provisions substituted therefor in 1980.

This chapter was reenacted by Acts 1980, ch. 617.

For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Bank deposits and collections, title 47, ch. 4.

Conversion of financial institutions, title 45, ch. 11.

Cooperative scholarship corporations, building and loan associations participating in plans, §49-4-106.

Funds transfers, title 47, ch. 4A.

Investment of public funds in federal savings and loan associations accounts, §9-1-107.

Letters of credit, title 47, ch. 5.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Tennessee Reciprocal Savings Institution Act, title 45, ch. 3, part 14.

Law Reviews.

State and Local Taxation of Financial Institutions: An Opportunity for Reform (C. James Judson & Susan G. Duffy), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 1057 (1986).

45-3-102. Scope and application.

Effect on Existing Associations. The charter of every savings and loan association, by whatever name called, heretofore organized under the laws of this state existing and in good standing on July 1, 1978, shall continue in full force and effect, subject to compliance with this chapter, and the same shall be deemed as modified to conform with this chapter without the adoption or approval of a new charter, as to corporate powers and functions, and all associations shall bring themselves into compliance as to corporate powers and functions within twelve (12) months from July 1, 1978. An association existing on July 1, 1978, and that is not then in compliance with minimum capital requirements may continue to operate with its existing capital so long as its accounts are insured as provided in this chapter. Unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, the contracts, obligations, rights, powers, and liabilities of every such association, and the contracts, notes, mortgages, investments, and other assets of every kind and nature whatsoever held by it, as well as its bylaws and resolutions, shall continue in full force and effect. Every existing association and every association hereafter organized under this chapter shall, except as otherwise provided, be subject to this chapter.

Effect on Federal Associations. Unless federal laws or regulations provide otherwise, federal savings and loan associations and their members shall possess all of the rights, powers, privileges, immunities, and exemptions granted by this chapter to associations operating hereunder.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.02; T.C.A., § 45-1302.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

45-3-103. Application of general corporation law and the Uniform Administration Procedures Act.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by this chapter or unless the application would otherwise conflict with the purposes of this chapter, the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27, and of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, as each of those acts may be amended from time to time, shall apply to all associations governed by this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.03; T.C.A., § 45-1303; Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

The Tennessee General Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, ch.1, has been repealed effective January 1, 1988. New provisions concerning business corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 11-27. New provisions concerning nonprofit corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 51-68.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, §§ 4, 6, 8, 9.

45-3-104. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Association” means a capital stock or mutual savings and loan association;

“Capital stock association” means an association, the ownership of which rests in the holders of shares of capital stock, who may receive dividends on their shares, and who have the sole right to vote on matters affecting the association; and

“Mutual association” means an association, the ownership of which rests in members, who receive interest on their deposit accounts, and who have the sole right to vote on all matters affecting the association;

“Branch office” means an office or facility, other than the home office, at which payments on accounts and loans may be accepted and applications for loans may be received, at which accounts may be opened, and loans may be closed, and at which any other authorized business of the association may be transacted;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of financial institutions;

“Deposit” or “deposit account” means that part of the deposit liability of an association that is credited to the account of the holder;

“Deposit liability” means the aggregate amount of deposit accounts of depositors or members, including interest credited to the accounts, less redemptions and withdrawals;

“Depositor” means the holder of a deposit account in an association;

“Dividend” means that part of the net income or capital surplus of a capital stock association that is declared payable to the stockholders of the association from time to time by the board of directors, and is to be distinguished from “interest”;

“Electronic funds transfer system (EFTS)” means a computer payment system for transferring funds from one (1) party to another;

“Federal association” means a savings and loan association operating under the laws and regulations of the United States;

“Financial institution” means a thrift institution, commercial bank, or trust company;

“Home” means a structure designed for residential use by not more than four (4) families or a single condominium unit, including common elements pertinent thereto, designed for residential use by one (1) family in a multiple dwelling unit structure or complex, and includes fixtures;

“Home office” means the principal place of business maintained by the association and so designated in its charter, at which all authorized business of the association may be transacted;

“Home property” means real estate on which there is located, or will be located, a home;

“Homeowner” means any person or persons in whose name or names legal title to a home, or real property on which a home is located, or is to be located, is registered pursuant to the laws of this state;

“Impaired condition” means a condition in which the assets of an association in the aggregate do not equal the aggregate amount of its liabilities;

“Interest” means that part of the net income, retained earnings, or surplus of an association that is payable to or credited to holders of deposit accounts;

“Interest date” means the effective date on which interest is payable to depositors on deposit accounts;

“Liquid assets” means:

Cash on hand;

Time certificates of deposit or cash on deposit in federal home loan banks, state banks performing similar functions, or in commercial banks, that is withdrawable upon not more than thirty (30) days' notice and that is not pledged as security for indebtedness, except that any deposits in a bank that is being liquidated or rehabilitated by any supervisory authority shall not be considered as liquid assets;

Obligations of, or obligations that are fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by, the United States or this state; and

Other assets that the commissioner may, by rule or regulation, designate as liquid assets;

“Member” means a person holding a deposit account of a mutual association;

“Mobile home” means a dwelling designed for occupancy by a single family unit, which may be permanently affixed to real property, and is designed to be movable from one (1) location to another. “Mobile home” does not include recreation vehicles or campers;

“Net income” means gross revenues for an accounting period, less all interest and expenses paid or incurred, taxes, and losses sustained that have not been charged to any reserve accounts;

“Net worth” means the aggregate of all loan contracts of an association, plus the aggregate value of all other assets of the association, less the aggregate amount of deposit accounts of depositors, including interest credited to the accounts, and less any other liabilities of the association;

“Person” means an individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, trust, estate, unincorporated association, company, or corporation organized under the laws of this or any other state, the United States or foreign country;

“Primarily residential property” means real estate on which there is located, or will be located pursuant to a real estate loan, any of the following:

A structure or structures designed or used primarily for residential rather than nonresidential purposes and consisting of more than one (1) dwelling unit;

A structure or structures designed or used primarily for residential rather than nonresidential purposes for students, residents, and persons under care, employees, or members of the staff of an educational, health, or welfare institution or facility; or

A structure or structures that are used in part for residential purposes for not more than one (1) family and in part for business purposes; provided, that the residential use of the structure or structures must be substantial and permanent, not merely transitory;

“Primary lending area” means any area within the territorial limits of this state or within a radius of one hundred (100) miles from the home office or branch of an association;

“Real estate loan” means any loan or other obligation secured by a lien on real estate in any state held in fee or in a leasehold extending or renewable automatically for a period of at least ten (10) years beyond the date scheduled for the final principal payment of the loan or obligation, or any transactions out of which a lien or claim is created against the real estate, including, inter alia, the purchase of the real estate in fee by an association and the concurrent or immediate sale thereof on installment contract;

“Remote service unit” means a facility where deposits to, withdrawals from, and transfers between existing accounts may be made and where payments on loans made or serviced by the association may be made;

“Satellite office” means a facility that is operated ancillary to a home or branch office and that does not have more than one thousand (1,000) square feet of floor space nor more than four (4) teller stations;

“Service organization” means either a corporation, the majority of the capital stock of which is owned by one (1) or more associations, and that has the powers to engage in those activities of general service corporations in which federal associations may invest; or a corporation, business trust, or other similar organization that is an affiliate of an association that owns a majority of the voting shares of the organization and that has the powers of an affiliate of a federal association;

“Stockholder” means the holder of one (1) or more shares of any class of capital stock of a capital stock association organized and operating pursuant to this chapter;

“Surplus” means the aggregate amount of the undistributed net income of an association held as undivided profits or unallocated reserves for general corporate purposes, and any paid-in surplus or initial undivided profits held by an association;

“Thrift institution” means an association, a mutual savings bank, a cooperative bank, a homestead association, a credit union, a federal association, a small loan company, and any supervised thrift or residential financing institution of a substantially similar nature as determined by the commissioner; and

“Withdrawal value” means the amount paid to an association on a deposit account, plus interest credited thereto, less lawful deductions therefrom, as shown by the books of the association.

Any reference in this chapter or elsewhere in this code to a savings and loan association, or to a federal savings and loan association, or to any association as may be defined in this chapter, includes a federal savings bank or other financial institution, the accounts of which are insured by the federal savings and loan insurance corporation (FSLIC) or any successor of the corporation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.04; T.C.A., § 45-1304; Acts 1984, ch. 705, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

The federal savings and loan insurance corporation, referred to in this section, was abolished, effective February 1, 1992. See the Historical and Statutory Notes under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Deposit, § 2; 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 7.

45-3-105. Powers of associations generally.

Every association has all the powers enumerated, authorized and permitted in this section and other rights, privileges, and powers as may be incidental to or reasonably necessary or appropriate for the accomplishment of the objects and purposes of the association, including those rights and powers not in conflict with this chapter conferred generally upon corporations by the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27. Without limiting the foregoing, and except as otherwise provided by this chapter, every association has the power to:

Deposits and Investments. Acquire deposits and pay interest on deposits, and lend and invest its funds;

Property Transfers. Acquire, hold, sell, dispose of, convey, mortgage, pledge, or lease any real or personal property;

Borrowing. Subject to any rules or regulations promulgated by the commissioner, borrow from sources, individual and corporate, for the uses and purposes of the association, which borrowings may be evidenced by the notes, bonds, debentures, or other obligations or securities as the commissioner may prescribe; and pledge, mortgage, or otherwise encumber any of its assets in connection therewith; provided, that in no event shall any borrowing by an association exceed seventy percent (70%) of the deposit liability of the association unless the commissioner shall grant written approval of a greater percentage;

Sale of Loans. Sell any loan, without recourse, including any participating interests therein;

Insurance of Accounts. Obtain and maintain insurance of its deposit accounts by the federal savings and loan insurance corporation, any agency of this state or other federal agency established for the purpose of insuring deposit accounts in associations, or with any other insurer approved by the commissioner and having a net worth not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000);

Membership in Organizations. Qualify as and become a member of a Federal Home Loan Bank, or any other agency of the United States or the state of Tennessee or of any organization to the extent that the agency or organization assists in furthering or facilitating the association's purposes or powers, and comply with any reasonable conditions of eligibility;

Safe Deposit Boxes. Maintain and let safes, boxes, or other receptacles for the safekeeping of personal property in the same manner as banks are authorized to do under the laws of this state; provided, that in the event of any conflict with the law relating to safe deposit boxes in banks, this law shall be controlling. Any association has the right to construct a vault on its real estate, or on premises leased by it, or to rent any vault that in the judgment of the directors will provide reasonable means of safety against loss by theft, fire, or other cause, in which vault may be placed safes, boxes, or receptacles, for the keeping of jewelry, diamonds, gold, bank notes, bonds, notes, and other valuables, and that may be rented by the association to other persons on terms that may be agreed by the parties, but it is understood that in no event shall the association be liable for any loss of the jewelry, diamonds, gold, bank notes, bonds, notes, or other valuables by theft, robbery, fire, or other cause, the association not being the insurer of the safety of the property, nor in any manner liable therefor. The association is not required to take any note of property thus deposited, as the person who rents a safe, box, or receptacle is, for the term of the lease, the owner thereof;

Money Orders, etc. Sell money orders, travel checks, and similar instruments drawn by it on its bank accounts or as agents for any organization empowered to sell the instruments within this state;

Fiscal Agent. Act as fiscal agent of the United States, of this state, or of any subdivision of this state when duly designated for that purpose, and as fiscal agent perform the reasonable functions that may be required by it;

Servicing. Service loans and investments for others;

Limited Trusteeship. Act as trustee or custodian within the contemplation of the Federal Self-Employed Individual Tax Retirement Act of 1962, the Federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or similar federal acts, all as may be amended from time to time; and act as trustee or custodian with regard to other activities that may be authorized to federal associations by federal law or regulation. An association exercising the powers authorized by this subdivision (11) shall segregate all funds held in those fiduciary capacities from the general assets of the association and shall keep a separate set of books and records, showing in detail all transactions made under authority of this subdivision (11). If the individual records are kept as aforementioned, all funds held in the fiduciary capacities by an association may be commingled for appropriate purposes of investment. The funds may be invested in deposit accounts of the association in the event that the trust, custodial, or other plan does not prohibit the investment;

Employee Stock Option Plans. Establish, as part of its compensation benefits to its full-time employees, a plan or plans whereby the employing association may issue shares of its capital stock to the employees as compensation to them at a value to be established periodically, but at least annually, by the board of directors of the employing association, which value may be less than the market value of the stock or less than the price at which the stock may be offered to nonemployees; provided, that the plan is approved by a majority of the stockholders of the employing association. The plan may include provisions for the creation of a retirement trust whereby the stock issued to the employees and accumulated earnings on the stock are held in trust for the employees' retirement; and

Electronic Funds Transfer Systems. Subject to rules and regulations of the commissioner, transfer funds between holders of deposit accounts, and third parties, or their designees, by means of electronic funds transfer systems. No such system or any part of the system, including terminals or processing centers, shall of itself be considered a branch or satellite office.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.05; T.C.A., § 45-1305; Acts 1981, ch. 36, § 1; 1984, ch. 626, § 1; 1994, ch. 551, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

The Federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 referred to in this section is compiled in 5 U.S.C. §§ 5108, 5109; 18 U.S.C. §§ 664, 1027, 1954; 26 U.S.C. generally; 29 U.S.C. §§ 1221, 1222, 1302, 1381; 42 U.S.C. § 1320b-1.

The federal savings and loan insurance corporation, referred to in this section, was abolished, effective February 1, 1992. See the Historical and Statutory Notes under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.

The Federal Self-Employed Individual Tax Retirement Act of 1962 referred to in this section is compiled in 26 U.S.C. §§ 37, 62, 72, 101, 104, 105, 172, 401-405, 503, 805, 1361, 2039, 2517, 3306, 3401, 6047, 7207.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, §§ 8, 13.

45-3-106. Tie-in provision.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the laws of this state, every association organized and incorporated pursuant to or operating under this chapter has all the powers granted to savings and loan associations whose home offices are located in this state and that are incorporated or operating under the laws of the United States.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.06; T.C.A., § 45-1306.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

45-3-107. Corporate form required — Capital stock and mutual associations authorized.

No person, except a corporation chartered by the state of Tennessee or a federally chartered association, shall engage in the business of a savings and loan association in this state.

The charter of an association may provide for the issuance of capital stock or for the organization of the association as a mutual association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.07; T.C.A., § 45-1307.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, §§ 4, 6, 9.

45-3-108. Ownership of associations — Changes affecting control.

The rights and incidents of ownership in a capital stock association shall be vested in the holders of capital stock as shown on the books of the association and in no other persons. Depositors in capital stock associations shall not be vested with any rights or incidents of ownership in the association. The rights and incidents of ownership in a mutual association shall be vested in the depositors of the association.

Section 45-2-103 is applicable to state-chartered savings and loan associations. Unless the context requires other meaning, references to bank in § 45-2-103 include state-chartered savings and loan associations for the purposes of this subsection (b) only, and shall not be construed to give the associations any rights or powers not set forth in this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.08; T.C.A., § 45-1308; Acts 1984, ch. 697, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

Acts 1984, ch. 697, § 3 provided that the provisions of the 1984 amendment by that act were remedial in nature and to be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 7.

45-3-109. Capital stock — Nature.

Capital stock shall constitute a reserve out of which losses shall be paid after all other available reserves have been exhausted, and shall have a par value, or if the capital stock has no par value, then a stated value, of one dollar ($1.00) per share or another amount that the charter may prescribe.

Nonwithdrawability. Capital stock shall be nonwithdrawable, except as otherwise specifically provided by this chapter, or by the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27.

Dividends. Capital stock shall be entitled to dividends, unless limited by this chapter, or by the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.09; T.C.A., § 45-1309; Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

The Tennessee General Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, ch. 1, has been repealed effective January 1, 1988. New provisions concerning business corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 11-27. New provisions concerning nonprofit corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 51-68.

45-3-110. Capital stock associations — Issuance of capital stock.

An association may issue the shares of capital stock authorized by its charter and none other. The capital stock of an association, when issued, shall not be retired or withdrawn except as hereinafter provided until all liabilities of the association have been satisfied in full, including the withdrawal value of all deposit accounts. An association may issue shares of common stock and preferred stock, with or without par value, and the common and preferred stock may be divided into classes and the classes into series. Capital stock of an association shall be issued pursuant to the following requirements:

Consideration for Issuance of Stock. Except for stock issued pursuant to an employee stock option plan, or pursuant to a plan of merger, consolidation, conversion from a mutual to a stock association, or other type of reorganization that has been approved by the commissioner, the consideration for the issuance of capital stock shall be paid in cash and the par value or stated value thereof shall be maintained as the permanent capital of the association, and any excess shall be credited to paid-in surplus;

Permanent Capital — Reduction and Retirement. The aggregate par value or stated value of all outstanding shares of capital stock shall be the permanent capital of the association, and, except as otherwise specifically provided by this chapter, the capital stock shall not be retired until final liquidation of the association. No association shall reduce the par or stated value of its outstanding capital stock without first obtaining the written approval of the commissioner, and approval shall be withheld if the reduction will cause the par or stated value of outstanding capital stock to be less than the minimum required by this chapter, or will result in less than adequate net worth as the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, determine. No association shall retire any part of its capital stock unless the retirement is approved by the commissioner. With the written approval of the commissioner, an association may purchase its capital stock from the personal representative of a deceased stockholder; and with the written approval, an association may contract with a living stockholder for the purchase upon the stockholder's death. The purchase shall be for a price, and upon terms and conditions, that are agreed upon by the association and the stockholder or personal representative; provided, that the purchase shall not reduce the net worth accounts of the association, or any of them, to an amount less than required by applicable law or by the approved insurer of the association's deposit accounts. An association agreeing with a stockholder to purchase that stockholder's capital stock upon the stockholder's death may purchase insurance upon the life of the stockholder to fund or partially fund the purchase. Any stock purchased from a decedent's personal representative may be resold by the association at the price, and upon terms and conditions, that the board of directors of the association approves or may be retired; provided, that prior to resale, notice shall be filed with the commissioner disclosing the price, terms, and conditions of the proposed resale.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.10; T.C.A., § 45-1310.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 6.

45-3-111. Capital stock and mutual associations — Minimum capital requirements.

The minimum capital with which an association shall commence business shall be determined by reference to, in the case of a capital stock association, the sum of the par or stated value of all issued and outstanding shares of voting common capital stock, and, in the case of a mutual association, the total of all subscribed and paid-in deposit accounts. The minimum capital of an association shall be prescribed by the commissioner; provided, that the minimum capital shall not be less than:

One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) if the home office of the association is to be located in a county having less than ten thousand (10,000) inhabitants;

Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) if the home office is to be located in a county having between ten thousand (10,000) and one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants; and

Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) if the home office is to be located in a county having one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants or more.(2) The population of each county shall be based upon the latest federal census.

Notwithstanding the above requirements, if the home office of an association is to be located in a county that is contiguous to a county the population of which would require higher minimum capital requirements, and if the commissioner determines that the association will draw a substantial amount of its depositors from the contiguous county, the commissioner shall require that the association meet the higher capital requirements of the contiguous county.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.11; T.C.A., § 45-1311.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

45-3-112. Capital stock associations — Paid-in surplus.

In addition to the minimum capital required by this chapter for a capital stock association to commence business, the subscribers to the capital stock of the association shall pay an additional amount for their stock equal to not less than fifty percent (50%) of the par or stated value of the stock subscribed, which additional amount shall be credited to the paid-in surplus account and may be used for organization and operating expenses, including interest to the holders of deposit accounts. The minimum capital and surplus may be used for the reserves required by this chapter and as permitted by the commissioner.

The capital, paid-in surplus, retained earnings, and other net worth accounts of an association, or any combination of the net worth accounts, may, by action of the association and subject to approval of the commissioner, be specifically earmarked as an insurance reserve account to be used solely for absorbing losses.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.12; T.C.A., § 45-1312.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

45-3-113. Mutual associations — Expense fund requirements.

The incorporators of a mutual association, in addition to their subscriptions to deposit accounts, shall create an expense fund in an amount not less than fifty percent (50%) of the minimum capital required by this chapter for the association to commence business.

Any organization and operating expenses may be paid from the fund until such time as the net income of the association is sufficient to pay the interest that is declared and paid or credited to deposit account holders from sources available for the payment of interest.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.13; T.C.A., § 45-1313.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

45-3-114. Mutual associations — Repayment of contributions to expense fund.

Contributions made by the incorporators and others to the expense fund and to the undivided profits account, if so required by the commissioner, may be repaid pro rata to the contributors from the net income of the association after provision for required loss reserves and declaration of interest of not less than two percent (2%) on deposit accounts.

In case of the liquidation of an association before contributions to the expense fund and to the undivided profits account have been repaid, any contributions to the expense fund and to the undivided profits account remaining unexpended, after payment of expenses of liquidation, all creditors and the withdrawal value of all deposit accounts, shall be paid to the contributors pro rata.

The books of the association shall reflect the expense fund and undivided profits account.

Contributors to the expense fund and to the undivided profits account shall be paid interest on the amounts paid in by them and for that purpose the contributions shall in all respects be considered as deposit accounts of the association.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or by rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner, the amounts contributed to the expense fund and to the undivided profits account shall not constitute a liability to the association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.14; T.C.A., § 45-1314.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

45-3-115. Change of office or name.

No association shall, without the prior approval of the commissioner:

Establish any branch or satellite office other than the home office stated in its charter;

Move any home, branch, or satellite office of the association from its immediate vicinity; or

Change the name of any association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.24; T.C.A., § 45-1324.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

45-3-116. Exemption from securities laws.

All associations subject to this chapter and all federal associations, the directors, officers, agents, or employees of the associations, deposit accounts and capital stock of the associations and the sale, issuance, or offering for sale of deposit accounts and capital stock of the associations are exempted from all provisions of law of this state, other than this chapter, that provide for supervision, registration, or regulation in connection with the sale, issuance, or offering for sale of securities, and the sale, issuance, or offering for sale of the accounts or stock shall not require any action or approval whatsoever by any official authorized to license, regulate, or supervise the sale, issuance, or offering for sale of securities.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.23; T.C.A., § 45-1723.

45-3-117. Acknowledgments by stockholders, members, and employees.

No public officer qualified to take acknowledgments or proofs of any instrument in writing in which an association is interested shall be disqualified by reason of the officer's status as a stockholder, member, or employee of the association so interested, and the acknowledgments or proofs previously taken are validated.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.24; T.C.A., § 45-1724.

45-3-118. References to “building and loan association.”

Any and all references in any provision of the laws of this state to the term “building and loan association” are deemed to refer to the term “savings and loan association.”

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.25; T.C.A., § 45-1725.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, §§ 1, 2.

45-3-119. References to federal savings and loan associations.

Any and all references in any provision of the laws of this state to “federal savings and loan associations” are deemed to refer to “savings and loan associations operating under the laws of this state and federal savings and loan associations.”

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.26; T.C.A., § 45-1726.

45-3-120. Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to promote and foster a sound and efficient system of savings and loan associations.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.27; T.C.A., § 45-1727.